Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated to the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission, for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of $19,514,353.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of  $628,510
is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment
of expenses from lottery moneys allocated  from the Veterans’ Services Fund established
under ORS 406.140 to the  Oregon Criminal Justice Commission, for veterans’ specialty
courts.
SECTION 3.
Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$151,247,749 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the  maximum limit for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or  received by the Oregon Criminal
Justice Commission.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$15,098,131 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses from federal funds collected or received by the Oregon  Criminal Justice
Commission.
SECTION 5. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation,  there is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025,
out of the General Fund, the amount of $54,861,333, for deposit into the Oregon  Public Safety
Fund established by section 4, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled House Bill 3069).
SECTION 6.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation,  there is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025,
out of the General Fund, the amount of $15,560,850, for deposit  into the Oregon Treatment
Court Grant Program  Account established by section 22, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025
(Enrolled House Bill 3069).
SECTION 7.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation,  there is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025,
out of the General  Fund, the amount of $4,715,308, for deposit into the Organized Retail Theft
Grant Program Account established  by section 25, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled
House Bill 3069).
Enrolled House Bill 5005 (HB 5005-A) Page 1
SECTION 8. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025,
out of the General Fund, the  amount of $40,000,000, for deposit into the Oregon Behavioral
Health Deflection Program Account established by section 78,  chapter 70, Oregon Laws 2024.
SECTION 9.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation,  there is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025,
out of the  General Fund, the amount of $10,000,000, for deposit into the Improving People’s
Access to Community-based Treatment, Supports and Services Account  established by ORS
430.233.
SECTION 10.
In addition to and not in lieu of any  other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission, for the  biennium beginning July 1, 2025,
out of the General Fund, the amount of $6,000,000, for  deposit into the Oregon Jail-Based
Medications for Opioid Use Disorder Fund established by section  87, chapter 70, Oregon Laws
2024.
SECTION 11. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
Passed by House June 13, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 19, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5005 (HB 5005-A) Page 2